Hawaii statutes.
§371-13 Cooperation with federal agencies.
The department of labor and industrial relations may assist and cooperate with
the wage and hour division, United States Department of Labor, in the
enforcement within this State of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, and,
subject to regulations of the administrator of the wage and hour division and
the laws of the State applicable to the receipt and expenditure of money, may
be reimbursed by the division for the reasonable cost of such assistance and
cooperation. [L 1939, c 237, §1(17); RL 1945, §4120; RL 1955, §88-21; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §371-13]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next